Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.28, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. For filing claim; filing options. (a) A claim of an unfair discriminatory practice must be brought as a civil action pursuant to section 363A.33, subdivision 1, filed in a charge with a local commission pursuant to section 363A.07, subdivision 3, or filed in a charge with the commissioner within deleted text begin one year afterdeleted text end new text begin ten years of new text end the occurrence of the practice. (b) The running of the deleted text begin one-yeardeleted text end new text begin ten-yearnew text end limitation period is suspended during the time a potential charging party and respondent are voluntarily engaged in a dispute resolution process involving a claim of unlawful discrimination under this chapter, including arbitration, conciliation, mediation or grievance procedures pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement or statutory, charter, ordinance provisions for a civil service or other employment system or a school board sexual harassment or sexual violence policy. A potential respondent who participates in such a process with a potential charging party before a charge is filed or a civil action is brought shall notify the department and the charging party in writing of the participation in the process and the date the process commenced and shall also notify the department and the charging party of the ending date of the process. A respondent who fails to provide this notification is barred from raising the defense that the statute of limitations has run unless deleted text begin one yeardeleted text end new text begin ten yearsnew text end plus a period of time equal to the suspension period has passed. (c) The running of the deleted text begin one-yeardeleted text end new text begin ten-yearnew text end limitation period is suspended during the applicable time period under section 363A.331, subdivision 2, during which a civil action may not be brought.